Delaware, session 153, HB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 21, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2148. Inspection of vehicles and on-board diagnostics trouble codes (DTC) The Department may not refuse to register or renew the registration of a vehicle if, upon inspection, the vehicleâs on-board diagnostics trouble code or DTC codes indicate the vehicle may have some non-emission related problem.